Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Medical Practice
§ 33-30-225.
Reciprocity.

Persons permitted to practice as an animal euthanasia technician under the laws of any other state having requirements substantially equal to those provided for in this act may, in the discretion of the board, be issued a certificate to practice in this state.

History.

2013 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 127, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.